Washington statutes.
RCW 39.28.030

Construction of act.

The powers conferred by RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 shall be in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for the powers now or hereafter conferred upon any municipality by any other law. RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 is intended to aid in relieving the existing emergency by simplifying the procedure for the construction and financing of public works projects. RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 is remedial in nature and the powers hereby granted shall be liberally construed. Nothing in RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds for any purpose by any municipality not authorized to issue bonds for such purpose under any other law heretofore or hereafter enacted, nor to dispense with the approval by a state department, board, officer or commission of a public works project where such approval is necessary under provisions of existing law: PROVIDED, That any port district which is now indebted in an amount equal to or in excess of the indebtedness which may be contracted without a vote of the electors of the district is hereby authorized, for the purposes of RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030, through its governing body, to contract a further indebtedness and borrow money for port purposes and issue general bonds therefor, as in RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 provided, in an additional amount not exceeding three-sixteenths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, without the assent of the voters of the district: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such additional indebtedness together with the existing indebtedness of such port district shall not exceed the total indebtedness permitted to be incurred by such port district under existing laws.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 25; 1937 c 107 s 4; RRS s 10322A-10. Prior: 1935 c 107 s 4; RRS s 10322A-4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.

Short title—Severability—1937 c 107: See notes following RCW 39.28.010.